Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Penalties

§ 77-7-311.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provisions of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, requirement or order thereunder, or any term or condition of any certificate or permit, for which a penalty is not otherwise provided in this chapter, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) and not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for the first offense and not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person, whether carrier, shipper, consignee, or any officer, employee, agent or representative thereof, who shall knowingly offer, grant or give, or solicit, accept or receive any rebate, concession or discrimination in violation of any provision of this chapter, or who by means of any false statement or representation, or by the use of any false or fictitious bill, bill of lading, receipt, voucher, roll, account, claim, certificate, affidavit, deposition, lease or bill of sale, or by any other means or device, shall knowingly and willfully assist, suffer or permit any person or persons, natural or artificial, to obtain transportation of passengers or property subject to this chapter for less than the applicable rate, fare or charge, or who shall knowingly and willfully, by any such means or otherwise, fraudulently seek to evade or defeat regulation as in this chapter provided for motor carriers, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for the first offense and not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for any subsequent offense.

Any owner, operator or driver of any vehicle, who is required by any law or by any rule or regulation of the commission to stop at any inspection station or submit to an inspection, who willfully fails or refuses to do so, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or more than One Thousand Dollars ($1000.00), or by confinement in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both fine and jail sentence.

Any individual, corporation or partnership operating a motor vehicle transporting hazardous material that is found to be in violation of any rule, regulation or requirement as provided by Section 77-7-16 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for the first offense, and not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person operating or attempting to operate a motor vehicle which has been placed out of service by a motor carrier inspector shall be fined One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7679, 7692-06; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 7; Laws, 1960, ch. 406, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 544, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 18, eff from and after October 1, 1993.